Washington statutes.
RCW 35.17.330

Legislative—Initiative—Effective date—Record.

If the number of votes cast thereon favor the proposed ordinance, it shall become effective immediately and shall be made a part of the record of ordinances of the city.

[ 1965 c 7 s 35.17.330. Prior: 1911 c 116 s 21, part; RRS s 9110, part.]